Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.035

Committee members—Liability.

No member of the committee is liable for the negligence, default, or failure of any other person or members of the committee to perform the duties of office and no member may be considered or held to be an insurer of the funds or assets of any of the advanced college tuition payment program or any of the Washington college savings program.

[ 2016 c 69 s 7; 1998 c 69 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 69: See note following RCW 28B.95.025.